Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,116
Approval by third persons.

The articles may require an amendment to the articles or bylaws to be approved in writing by a specified person or persons other than the board. Such an article provision may only be amended with the approval in writing of such person or persons.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 116.